Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of the Oregon Vehicle
Code.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) An entity that is a provider under the  Oregon Prenatal to Kindergarten Program or
other public early learning and preschool  programs established under ORS 329.172 to 329.200;
(C) The Oregon School for the Deaf;
(D) An education service district;
(E) An educational  program under the Youth Corrections Education Program or the Ju-
venile Detention Education Program, as those terms are defined in ORS 326.695; or
(F) A program that receives moneys pursuant to ORS 343.243.
(b) “Stop arm camera” means a video recording device that is installed on a  school bus
for the purpose of recording drivers  who fail to stop for bus safety lights in violation of ORS
811.155 and that is capable of recording the date, time, registration plate number and location
of the offense.
(2) Consistent with public  contracting law and applicable collective bargaining agree-
ments, an education provider may enter into a contract for the installation,  operation and
maintenance of stop arm cameras on school buses to photograph, by automated means,
drivers who violate ORS 811.155. A camera installed, operated or maintained as provided  by
this subsection may not photograph the driver of a school bus while  the driver is on the
school bus or the students of a school bus while the students are on the school bus.
(3) When a stop arm camera is installed on a school bus:
(a) The education provider  must inform, or cause to be informed, persons who will drive,
maintain or otherwise interact with the school bus, as determined  by the education provider,
that a stop arm camera is installed on the bus.
(b) Except as provided by agreement, an education  provider may not require or expect
an employee to perform any job duties  related to the installation, operation or maintenance
of the stop arm camera.
Enrolled House Bill 4147 (HB 4147-A) Page 1
(c) An education provider may not require, as a  condition of employment, that an em-
ployee participate in  the issuance of a citation for violation of ORS 811.155, unless partic-
ipation is required by law enforcement or for  a judicial proceeding. Nothing in this paragraph
prohibits a driver of a school bus from reporting a violation as allowed under ORS 811.157.
(d) A warning sign must be posted on the school bus indicating the  use of the stop arm
camera.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a law enforcement agency that has en-
tered into an agreement  with an education provider related to stop arm cameras on school
buses may issue a citation for violation of ORS 811.155  on the basis of photographs or video
from a camera and other technology, including sensors that measure  movement of a motor
vehicle while a stop arm is deployed without the presence of a police officer, if  the following
conditions are met:
(a) A police officer has reviewed the evidence and signs the citation.
(b) The citation is mailed  to the registered owner of the vehicle within 10 business days
of the alleged violation.
(c) The registered owner is given 30 days from the date the  citation is mailed to respond
to the citation.
(d) A rebuttable presumption exists that the registered owner of  the vehicle was the
driver of the vehicle when the citation is issued and delivered as provided in this section.
(e) A driver issued a citation under this subsection may respond to the citation by sub-
mitting a certificate of innocence or a certificate of  nonliability under subsection (6) of this
section or may make any other response allowed by law.
(5) A citation may be delivered by  mail or otherwise to the registered owner of the ve-
hicle or to the driver. The citation may be prepared on a  digital medium, and the signature
may be electronic in accordance with the provisions of ORS 84.001 to 84.061.
(6)(a) A registered owner of a vehicle may  respond by mail to a citation issued under
subsection (4) of this  section by submitting, within 30 days after the mailing of the citation,
a certificate of innocence swearing or affirming that the owner was not the driver  of the
vehicle and  by providing a photocopy of the owner’s driver license. A jurisdiction that re-
ceives a certificate of  innocence under this paragraph shall dismiss the citation without re-
quiring a court appearance by the registered owner or any other  information from the
registered owner other than  the certificate of innocence and the photocopy. The citation may
be reissued only once, only  to the registered owner and only if the jurisdiction verifies that
the registered owner appears to have been the driver at the  time of the violation. A regis-
tered owner may not submit a certificate of innocence in response to a reissued citation.
(b) If a business or public agency responds to a  citation issued under subsection (4) of
this section by submitting, within 30 days after the mailing of the citation, a certificate  of
nonliability stating that at the time of the alleged violation the vehicle was in  the custody
and control of  an employee, or was in the custody and control of a renter or lessee under
the terms of a rental agreement or lease, and if the business or public agency provides the
driver license number, name and address of the employee, renter or lessee, the citation  shall
be dismissed with respect to  the business or public agency. The citation may then be issued
and delivered by mail or otherwise to the employee, renter  or lessee identified in the certif-
icate of nonliability.
(7) If the person named as the registered owner of a  vehicle in the current records of the
Department of Transportation fails to respond to a citation issued under subsection  (4) of
this section, a default judgment under ORS 153.102 may be  entered for failure to appear after
notice has been given that the judgment will be entered.
(8) The penalties for and all consequences of violating  ORS 811.155 initiated by the sub-
mission of a report under this section are the same as the penalties  for and all consequences
of violating ORS 811.155 initiated by any other means.
Enrolled House Bill 4147 (HB 4147-A) Page 2
(9) A registered owner, employee,  renter or lessee against whom a judgment for failure
to appear is entered may  move the court to relieve the owner, employee, renter or lessee
from the judgment as provided in ORS 153.105 if the failure to appear was due to  mistake,
inadvertence, surprise or excusable neglect.
(10) An image or video recording produced by a  stop arm camera may not be used for
any purpose other than the investigation of a violation or a crime.
SECTION 3.  ORS 820.100 is amended to read:
820.100. (1) The State Board of Education shall adopt and enforce such  reasonable standards
relating to school bus and school activity vehicle construction and school bus  and school activity
vehicle equipment as the board deems necessary for safe and economical operation, except that  the
board may not authorize the use of school buses manufactured before April 1, 1977.
(2) The governing board of  a public university listed in ORS 352.002 may adopt and enforce
separate standards  of the type described under this section for school buses and school activity ve-
hicles that are under  the governing board’s jurisdiction, except that the governing board may not
authorize the use of school buses manufactured before April 1, 1977.
(3) The State Board of Education shall adopt  and enforce standards for school bus stop arms
authorized by ORS 820.105.
(4) The State Board of Education shall adopt and  enforce standards for school bus stop
arm camera warning signs authorized by section 2 of this 2024 Act.
[(4)] (5) Standards adopted under this section:
(a) Must be consistent with requirements established by statute or by rule adopted under stat-
utory authority that relate to the same subject.
(b) Shall be consistent with minimum uniform national standards, if such standards exist.
(c) May include  different requirements for different classes or types of school buses or school
activity vehicles.
(d) May include any exemptions determined appropriate under ORS 820.150.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 468A.796 is amended to read:
468A.796. (1) All school buses powered by diesel engines operated in Oregon must, by January
1, [ 2025] 2026, be:
(a) Repowered with an engine meeting 2007 fine particulate matter federal  exhaust emission
standards for diesel heavy-duty engines as set forth in 40 C.F.R. 86.007-11;
(b) Retrofitted:
(A) If retrofitted prior to August 15, 2017, with best available exhaust control technology; or
(B) If retrofitted on or after  August 15, 2017, with exhaust controls meeting 2007 fine particulate
matter federal  exhaust emission standards for diesel heavy-duty engines as set forth in 40 C.F.R.
86.007-11; or
(c) Replaced with school buses manufactured on or after January 1, 2007.
(2) A school bus replaced under subsection (1)(c) of this section may not  be used for transpor-
tation of any type.
Enrolled House Bill 4147 (HB 4147-A) Page 3
Passed by House February 19, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4147 (HB 4147-A) Page 4